District of Columbia statutes.
3-2016

Repealed

Reciprocity.

Repealed.

June 7, 1938, 52 Stat. 616, ch. 321, § 16
Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-245,§ 38(b), 40 DCR 660
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1236, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 2-916.
1973 Ed., § 2-1316.

Repeal of Law 9-245

See note to § 3-2001.